Illinois, session 104th, SB2171.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 9administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, state 10universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities, 11villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 12municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 13commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 14foregoing including but not limited to committees and 15subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 16under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" does not 17include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 18Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 19Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory board or 20the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under the 21Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 22Advisory Board Act.23    (b) "Person" means any individual, corporation,   SB2171- 2 -LRB104 08950 BDA 19005 b1partnership, firm, organization or association, acting 2individually or as a group.3    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 4writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 5photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 6data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 7information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 8the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 9form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 10having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 11of, or under the control of any public body.12    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 13including a person's social security number, driver's license 14number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 15personal financial information, passwords or other access 16codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 17and personal email addresses. Private information also 18includes home address and personal license plates, except as 19otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 20of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 21HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 22electronic medical records and all information, including 23demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 24electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 25the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 26privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to,   SB2171- 3 -LRB104 08950 BDA 19005 b1the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 2its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 3subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 4the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.5    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 6public record or records, or information derived from public 7records, in any form for (i) sale, resale, or solicitation or 8advertisement for sales or services or (ii) any use or purpose 9that furthers the commercial, trade, or profit interests of 10the requester or the person on whose behalf the request is 11made. For purposes of this definition, requests made by news 12media and non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations 13shall not be considered to be made for a "commercial purpose" 14when the principal purpose of the request is (i) to access and 15disseminate information concerning news and current or passing 16events, (ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest 17to the public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, 18scientific, or public research or education.19    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 20by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 21process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 22available to the public body.23    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 24chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 25manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 26executive and administrative authority for the public body, or   SB2171- 4 -LRB104 08950 BDA 19005 b1such person's duly authorized designee.2    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical 3issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 4format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 5a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 6community antenna television service, or a person or 7corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 8picture news for public showing.9    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 10Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 11preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 12(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 13requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 14minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 15purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 16non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 17considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 18time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 19the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 20concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 21articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 22(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 23research or education.24    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 25written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 26to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via   SB2171- 5 -LRB104 08950 BDA 19005 b1personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 2means available to the public body and that identifies the 3particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 4identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 5    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 6includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 7different categories of records or a combination of individual 8requests that total requests for more than 5 different 9categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 10requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 11legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 12record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 13include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 14letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.15    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 16news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 17organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 18to access and disseminate information concerning news and 19current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 20features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 21academic, scientific, or public research or education.22    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 23written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 24to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 25personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 26means available to the public body and that identifies the   SB2171- 6 -LRB104 08950 BDA 19005 b1particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 2request may identify multiple individual records to be 3inspected or copied. 4    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 5any public body and its employee for the employee's 6resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 7(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.)